Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 12

Miscellaneous Provisions

61-1-1201. Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-1202. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Partnership Act.”

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-1203. Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-1204. Effective date.

This chapter takes effect on January 1, 2002, the public welfare requiring it.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-1205. Repeals.

Effective January 1, 2002, the following acts and parts of acts are repealed: §§ 61-1-101 through and including 61-1-142 of the Uniform Partnership Act as enacted in this state, as amended and in effect immediately before January 1, 2002.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-1206. Applicability.

Before January 1, 2002, this chapter governs only a partnership formed:

After January 1, 2002, unless that partnership is continuing the business of a dissolved partnership under § 61-1-129 of the prior Uniform Partnership Act; and

Before January 1, 2002, that elects, as provided by subsection (c), to be governed by this chapter.

After January 1, 2002, this chapter governs all partnerships.

Before January 1, 2002, a partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership's partners to third parties apply to limit those partners' liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one (1) year preceding the partnership's election to be governed by this act, only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership's election to be governed by this chapter.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-1207. Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before this chapter takes effect.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-1208. Filing fees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the secretary of state shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection (a) are delivered to the secretary of state for filing:

Document Fee

Certificate or conversion of limited liability partnership (including designation of initial registered office and agent) As provided in § 61-1-1001(c)

Application for use of indistinguishable name $20.00

Application for reserved name $20.00

Notice of transfer or cancellation of reserved name $20.00

Application for or change, cancellation, or renewal of assumed name $20.00

Statement of change of registered agent or registered office, or both, by limited liability partnership $20.00

Agent's statement of change of registered office $5.00 per limited liability partnership, but not less than $20.00

Agent's statement of resignation $20.00

Amendment to certificate $20.00

Notice of registration of foreign limited liability partnership (including designation of initial registered office and agent) As provided in § 61-1-1004(d)(7)

Application for amended registration of foreign limited liability partnership $20.00

Certificate of withdrawal $20.00

Notice of withdrawal of foreign limited liability partnership $20.00

Annual report and fee (domestic) As provided in § 61-1-1001(e)

Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution/revocation $70.00

Application for certificate of existence, registration or good standing $20.00

Any statement described in § 61-1-105 that is required or permitted to be filed in the office of the secretary of state $20.00

Any other document required or permitted to be filed by chapter 1 of this title $20.00

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) each time process is served on the secretary of state under chapter 1 of this title. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if such party prevails in the proceeding.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for copying all filed documents relating to a domestic or foreign limited liability partnership. All such copies will be certified or validated by the secretary of state.

If any statement described in § 61-1-105 is required or permitted by any section in this chapter to be filed in the office of the register of deeds in any county in Tennessee, the register of deeds shall charge the fees specified in § 8-21-1001.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for copying all filed documents relating to a domestic or foreign limited liability partnership or partnership. All such copies will be certified or validated by the secretary of state. A certificate attached or certification affixed to a copy of a document filed by the secretary of state, bearing the secretary of state's signature (which may be in facsimile) and the seal of this state, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the secretary of state.

Acts 1998, ch. 890, § 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4; 2001, ch. 353; T.C.A., § 61-1-148; Acts 2010, ch. 742, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2 — 43; Shan., §§ 3141b2 — 3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53 — 3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1 — 3; Code 1932, §§ 7841 — 7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101 — 61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1 — 10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.